Maryland, session 2025, SB0083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. OVERDOSE AND INFECTIOUS DISEASE PREVENTION SERVICES
PROGRAM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0083*

SENATE BILL 83
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION” MEANS A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE ORGANIZATION THAT:
(I) IS REPRESENTATIVE OF A COMMUNITY OR SIGNIFICANT
SEGMENTS OF A COMMUNITY; AND
(II) PROVIDES EDUCATIONAL, HEALTH, OR SOCIAL SERVICES
TO INDIVIDUALS IN THE COMMUNITY.
(2) “COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A HOSPITAL;
(II) A CLINIC;
(III) A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT CENTER;
(IV) A MEDICAL OFFICE;
(V) A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER;
(VI) A MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY;
(VII) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT; AND
(VIII) A FAITH–BASED ORGANIZATION.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS AN OVERDOSE AND INFECTIOUS DISEASE
PREVENTION SERVICES PROGRAM.
24–2502.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATION MAY ESTABLISH AN OVERDOSE AND INFECTIOUS DISEASE
PREVENTION SERVICES PROGRAM WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE NOT MORE THAN SIX
PROGRAMS, WITH EACH PROGRAM OPERATING AT A SINGLE LOCATION IN AN AREA

SENATE BILL 83 3
WITH A HIGH INCIDENCE OF DRUG USE.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE PROGRAMS APPROVED BY
THE DEPARTMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) TWO PROGRAMS LOCATED IN URBAN AREAS OF THE STATE;
(II) TWO PROGRAMS LOCATED IN SUBURBAN AREAS OF THE
STATE; AND
(III) TWO PROGRAMS LOCATED IN RURAL AREAS OF THE STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT, SHALL MAKE ITS DETERMINATION OF WHETHER TO APPROVE AN
APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION BASED ON THE ABILITY OF THE
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 24–2503
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT, SHALL:
(1) APPROVE OR DENY AN APPLICATION OF A COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATION WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE APPLICATION IS
RECEIVED; AND
(2) PROVIDE A WRITTEN EXPLANATION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S
DETERMINATION TO THE COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION.
24–2503.
(A) A PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE A LOCATION SUPERVISED BY HEALTH CARE
PROFESSIONALS OR OTHER TRAINED STAFF WHERE DRUG USERS CAN CONSUME
PREOBTAINED DRUGS;
(2) PROVIDE STERILE SUPPLIES FOR PERSONAL DRUG
ADMINISTRATION, COLLECT USED SUPPLIES, AND PROVIDE APPROPRIATE
DISPOSAL SERVICES OF USED SUPPLIES;
(3) ANSWER QUESTIONS ABOUT SAFE DRUG USE PRACTICES;
(4) ADMINISTER FIRST AID, IF NEEDED, MONITOR PARTICIPANTS FOR

SENATE BILL 83
POTENTIAL OVERDOSE, AND ADMINISTER RESCUE MEDICATIONS, INCLUDING
NALOXONE;
(5) PROVIDE ACCESS OR REFERRALS TO SERVICES, INCLUDING:
(I) SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER COUNSELING AND TREATMENT
SERVICES;
(II) TESTING FOR HIV, VIRAL HEPATITIS, AND SEXUALLY
TRANSMITTED DISEASES;
(III) REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH EDUCATION AND SERVICES; AND
(IV) WOUND CARE;
(6) EDUCATE PARTICIPANTS ON THE RISKS OF CONTRACTING HIV
AND VIRAL HEPATITIS;
(7) PROVIDE OVERDOSE PREVENTION EDUCATION AND ACCESS TO
OR REFERRALS TO OBTAIN NALOXONE;
(8) EDUCATE PARTICIPANTS REGARDING PROPER DISPOSAL OF
HYPODERMIC NEEDLES AND SYRINGES;
(9) PROVIDE REASONABLE AND ADEQUATE SECURITY OF THE
PROGRAM SITE AND EQUIPMENT;
(10) ESTABLISH A METHOD OF IDENTIFYING PROGRAM STAFF
MEMBERS WHO ARE AUTHORIZED TO ACCESS DRUG ADMINISTRATION SUPPLIES AND
PROGRAM RECORDS; AND
(11) TRAIN STAFF MEMBERS TO DELIVER SERVICES OFFERED BY THE
PROGRAM.
(B) A PROGRAM MAY:
(1) WITH THE CONSENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL, BILL THE INSURANCE
CARRIER OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO USES THE SERVICES OF THE PROGRAM FOR THE
COST OF COVERED SERVICES;
(2) ACCEPT DONATIONS, GRANTS, OR OTHER FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE;

SENATE BILL 83 5
(3) APPLY FOR GRANTS FROM THE DEPARTMENT OR ANY NONPROFIT
OR OTHER PRIVATE ORGANIZATION;
(4) COORDINATE WITH ANY SUBSTANCE USE PREVENTION AND
OUTREACH PROGRAM, SYRINGE SERVICES PROGRAM, OR COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATION; AND
(5) USE A MOBILE FACILITY TO OPERATE AND PROVIDE SERVICES.
(C) A PROGRAM MAY NOT BE LOCATED IN AN AREA THAT IS ZONED FOR
RESIDENTIAL USES.
24–2504.
(A) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS ACTING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO ARREST, PROSECUTION,
OR ANY CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY, INCLUDING A CIVIL PENALTY OR
DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY A PROFESSIONAL LICENSING BOARD, OR BE DENIED ANY
RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE FOR INVOLVEMENT IN THE OPERATION OR USE OF SERVICES
OF THE PROGRAM:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO USES SERVICES OF A PROGRAM;
(2) A STAFF MEMBER OF A PROGRAM, INCLUDING A HEALTH CARE
PROFESSIONAL, A MANAGER, AN EMPLOYEE, OR A VOLUNTEER; AND
(3) A PROPERTY OWNER WHO OWNS THE FACILITY AT WHICH A
PROGRAM IS LOCATED AND OPERATES.
(B) A PROPERTY OWNER, A MANAGER, AN EMPLOYEE, A VOLUNTEER, OR AN
INDIVIDUAL USING THE SERVICES OF A PROGRAM AND ACTING IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE SUBJECT UNDER STATE OR
LOCAL LAW TO THE SEIZURE OR FORFEITURE OF ANY REAL OR PERSONAL
PROPERTY USED IN CONNECTION WITH A PROGRAM.
24–2505.
NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 24–2504 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
PROPERTY OWNER, A MANAGER, AN EMPLOYEE, A VOLUNTEER, OR AN INDIVIDUAL
USING THE SERVICES OF A PROGRAM IS NOT IMMUNE FROM CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION FOR ANY ACTIVITIES NOT AUTHORIZED OR APPROVED BY THE
PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 83
24–2506.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, A PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE
AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE A REPORT
THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS AND THE NUMBER OF
TIMES A PARTICIPANT USED THE PROGRAM’S SERVICES;
(2) AGGREGATE INFORMATION REGARDING THE DEMOGRAPHIC
PROFILE OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS;
(3) THE NUMBER OF:
(I) ITEMS DISTRIBUTED FOR DRUG ADMINISTRATION FOR USE
ON–SITE, INCLUDING HYPODERMIC NEEDLES AND SYRINGES; AND
(II) OVERDOSES EXPERIENCED ON–SITE AND OVERDOSES
REVERSED ON–SITE;
(4) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO RECEIVED OVERDOSE CARE
AND THE TYPE AND NUMBER OF RESCUE DRUGS USED;
(5) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS REFERRED BY THE PROGRAM TO
OTHER SERVICES AND THE TYPE OF SERVICE TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUALS WERE
REFERRED; AND
(6) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES
IS NECESSARY FOR ASSESSING THE IMPACT OF THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.